New York, session 2025-2026, S7860.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 53 of the judiciary law, as 2 amended by chapter 450 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. The court shall prescribe rules providing for a uniform system of 5 examination of candidates for admission to practice as attorneys and 6 counsellors, which shall govern the state board of law examiners in the 7 performance of its duties. Such rules may require a candidate for admis- 8 sion to the bar to complete a certain number of hours of qualifying pro 9 bono service prior to filing an application for admission; provided, 10 however, that such qualifying pro bono service shall not include any 11 hours assisting in the provision of legal services required pursuant to 12 an agreement between the candidate for admission's supervisor or the 13 supervisor's law firm and the federal government under which the federal 14 government specifies the recipient or recipients or type or types or 15 nature of such legal services. The court shall not by its rules cause to 16 be barred from examination or, upon successful completion of the exam- 17 ination process, subsequent admission to the state bar, provided [he or 18 she] the candidate shall otherwise meet any requirements for admission, 19 any person who is currently admitted to practice in the jurisdiction of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11929-08-5 S. 7860--B 2 1 another state and has received a degree from a law school which quali- 2 fies such person to practice law in such state, other than a law school 3 which grants credit for correspondence courses, provided that such 4 person has been engaged in the actual practice of law in the state in 5 which they are admitted for no less than five years. 6 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 468-a of the judiciary law, as added by 7 chapter 714 of the laws of 1981, is amended to read as follows: 8 3. The chief administrator shall prescribe the form in which such 9 registry of attorneys shall be maintained and the procedures for public 10 access thereto, and may make all such other rules and regulations neces- 11 sary and appropriate to implement and enforce the provisions of this 12 section. Such form may require an attorney to report the number of hours 13 of pro bono service completed by the attorney at the time the attorney 14 files a biennial registration statement; provided, however, that such 15 qualifying pro bono service shall not include any hours assisting in the 16 provision of legal services required pursuant to an agreement between an 17 attorney or the attorney's law firm and the federal government under 18 which the federal government specifies the recipient or recipients or 19 type or types or nature of such legal services. 20 § 3. The judiciary law is amended by adding a new section 484-a to 21 read as follows: 22 § 484-a. Compulsory legal services prohibited. No law firm employer in 23 the state of New York may require an employee to assist in the provision 24 of legal services provided pursuant to an agreement between the law firm 25 and the federal government under which the federal government specifies 26 the recipient or recipients or type or types or nature of such legal 27 services. 28 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 29 it shall have become a law and shall expire and be deemed repealed Janu- 30 ary 20, 2029. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 31 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 32 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 33 on or before such effective date.